Washington statutes.
RCW 43.80.900

Effective date—1969 ex.s. c 80.

This act shall take effect on April 1, 1971, or at such time that the present fiscal agent agreement, contracted through April 1, 1971, is abrogated.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 80 s 8.]